Utah statutes.
40-2-402.   Certification requirements.
(1)  The commission shall collect a fee for:
(a)  the taking of a certification test; or
(b)  the retaking of one or more sections of a certification test.
(2) (a)  The commission shall establish fees by following Section 63J-1-504.
(b)  Notwithstanding Section 63J-1-504, the commission:
(i)  shall retain the fees as dedicated credits; and
(ii)  may only use the fees to administer the certification test.
(3)  An applicant who fails any section of the certification test may retake
that section of the test.
(4) (a)  An applicant who wishes to obtain a mine foreman certificate shall
have at least four years varied underground coal mining experience, of which:
(i)  two years' experience may be credited to a mining engineering graduate of
an accredited four-year college; or
(ii)  one year's experience may be credited to a graduate of a two-year course
in mining technology.
(b) (i)  An applicant who wishes to obtain a surface foreman certificate shall
have at least three years of varied surface experience.
(ii)  The commission may grant a surface foreman certificate applicant credit
for surface experience in any other industry that has substantially equivalent
surface facilities.
(c)  An applicant who wishes to obtain a fire boss certificate shall have at
least two years of underground coal mining experience, of which:
(i)  one year's experience may be credited to a mining engineering graduate of
an accredited four-year college; or
(ii)  six months' experience may be credited to a graduate of a two-year
course in mining technology.
(d)  An applicant who wishes to obtain an underground mine electrician
certificate shall have at least one year of varied electrical experience as
specified in 30 C.F.R. Sec. 75.153.
(e)  An applicant who wishes to obtain a surface mine electrician certificate
shall have at least one year of varied surface electrical experience as
specified in 30 C.F.R. Sec. 77.103.
(5)  A certificate granted under Section 40-2-401 and this section shall
expire if the certificate holder ceases to work in the mining industry or a
mine related industry for more than five consecutive years.
